Washington statutes.
RCW 31.35.050

Costs of supervision—Fees.

(1) The director is authorized to charge a fee for the estimated direct and indirect costs for examination and supervision by the director of an agricultural lender or a subsidiary of an agricultural lender. Excess examiner time shall be billed at a reasonable rate established by rule.

(2) All such fees shall be deposited in the financial services regulation fund and administered consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.320.110.

[ 2001 c 177 s 7; 1994 c 92 s 254; 1990 c 134 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 177: See note following RCW 43.320.080.